New Mexico, session 2026, SB255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Controlled Substances Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] TRAFFICKING OF FENTANYL RESULTING IN DEATH.-- A. Trafficking of fentanyl resulting in death consists of the intentional and unlawful trafficking or distribution of any amount of fentanyl to another person that results in the death of that person by cause of injecting, inhaling, absorbing or ingesting the fentanyl. Whoever commits trafficking of fentanyl resulting in death is guilty of first degree murder and shall serve a mandatory thirty-year sentence. B. In any prosecution for trafficking of fentanyl resulting in death, it is no defense that the deceased purposefully, knowingly, recklessly or negligently injected, inhaled, absorbed or ingested any amount of fentanyl." - 2 -